Tennessee, session 114, HB2457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-107(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Long-acting injectable drugs intended for treatment and prevention of human
immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and administered in a pharmacy, physician's office, clinic,
ambulatory surgical treatment center, or hospital, in accordance with § 71-5-175;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
71-5-175.
(a) A managed care organization (MCO) or pharmacy benefits manager (PBM)
shall reimburse a claim for a long-acting injectable drug:
(1) Intended for treatment and prevention of human immunodeficiency
virus (HIV); and
(2) Administered in a pharmacy, physician's office, clinic, ambulatory
surgical treatment center, or hospital.
(b) An MCO or PBM that covers a claim pursuant to subsection (a) as a medical
benefit or service shall also cover any such claim as a pharmacy benefit; provided, that:
(1) The MCO or PBM shall only reimburse a provider for each individual
treatment or service provided; and
HB2457
012670
- 1 -

(2) An individual provider may only be reimbursed for each claim under
either the pharmacy benefit or the medical benefit or service.
(c) This section applies to an MCO or PBM that is contracted with the bureau of
TennCare to administer and provide or reimburse for medical or pharmacy services for
TennCare enrollees on behalf of the bureau.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012670